Connecticut, session 2026, SB00226.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 9-163aa of the 2026 supplement to the general
2 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective July 1, 2026):
4 (a) (1) (A) Any eligible elector may vote prior to the day of a regular
5 election, in accordance with the provisions of this section, during a
6 period of early voting at each regular election held on or after April 1,
7 2024.
8 (B) The period of early voting under subparagraph (A) of this
9 subdivision shall (i) notwithstanding the provisions of section 9-2,
10 commence on the fifteenth day prior to and conclude on the second day
11 prior to such regular election, and (ii) consist of such days between and
12 inclusive of such commencement and conclusion, except any legal
13 holiday designated, appointed or recommended under section 1-4, and
14 at such times as provided in subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section
15 9-174.
LCO No. 1561 1 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
16 (2) (A) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (4) of this subsection,
17 any eligible elector may vote prior to the day of a primary, other than a
18 presidential preference primary, in accordance with the provisions of
19 this section, during a period of early voting at each primary, other than
20 a presidential preference primary, held on or after April 1, 2024.
21 (B) The period of early voting under subparagraph (A) of this
22 subdivision shall (i) notwithstanding the provisions of section 9-2,
23 commence on the eighth day prior to and conclude on the second day
24 prior to such primary, other than a presidential preference primary, and
25 (ii) consist of such days between and inclusive of such commencement
26 and conclusion, except any legal holiday designated, appointed or
27 recommended under section 1-4, and at such times as provided in
28 subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section 9-174.
29 (3) (A) Any eligible elector may vote prior to the day of a special
30 election, in accordance with the provisions of this section, during a
31 period of early voting at each special election held on or after April 1,
32 2024.
33 (B) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (4) of this subsection, any
34 eligible elector may vote prior to the day of a presidential preference
35 primary, in accordance with the provisions of this section, during a
36 period of early voting at each presidential preference primary held on
37 or after April 1, 2024.
38 (C) The period of early voting under subparagraph (A) or (B) of this
39 subdivision shall (i) notwithstanding the provisions of section 9-2,
40 commence on the fifth day prior to and conclude on the second day
41 prior to such special election or such presidential preference primary,
42 except that such commencing and concluding days shall be adjusted to
43 exclude from such period April 20, 2025, and any legal holiday
44 designated, appointed or recommended under section 1-4, and (ii)
45 consist of four total days between and inclusive of such commencement
46 and conclusion, as may be adjusted pursuant to subparagraph (C)(i) of
LCO No. 1561 2 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
47 this subdivision, and at such times as provided in subdivision (2) of
48 subsection (c) of section 9-174.
49 (4) (A) Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 9-19e, 9-23a, 9-26,
50 9-31a, 9-55, 9-56, as amended by this act, and 9-57:
51 (i) In the case of an unaffiliated elector who wishes to vote during the
52 period of early voting at a primary, such elector shall be eligible to so
53 vote if such elector's application for enrollment with the political party
54 holding such primary is filed with the registrars of voters by twelve
55 o'clock noon on the business day immediately preceding the day on
56 which such period of early voting commences.
57 (ii) In the case of a person who is not admitted as an elector and who
58 wishes to vote during the period of early voting at a primary, such
59 person shall be eligible to so vote if such person's application for
60 admission as an elector and enrollment with the political party holding
61 such primary is filed with the registrars of voters by twelve o'clock noon
62 on the business day immediately preceding the day during such period
63 of early voting on which such person offers to vote at such primary.
64 (B) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an individual
65 who enrolls in a political party during a period of early voting at a
66 primary from voting by absentee ballot, if eligible, or in person on the
67 day of such primary.
68 (b) (1) (A) The registrars of voters of each municipality shall designate
69 a location for the conduct of early voting [, which] but, if the registrars
70 fail to agree as to such location, the legislative body or, in a municipality
71 where the legislative body is a town meeting, the board of selectmen,
72 shall designate such location. Such location shall be the same for the
73 duration of the period of early voting except as otherwise specified in
74 this subdivision, provided [(A)] (i) the registrars of voters have access to
75 the state-wide centralized voter registration system from such location,
76 and [(B)] (ii) such location is certified in writing to the Secretary of the
77 State. [not later than sixty days prior to the day of an election or a
LCO No. 1561 3 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
78 primary.] The written certification under subparagraph [(B)] (A)(ii) of
79 this subdivision shall be submitted annually by the registrars of voters
80 to the Secretary not later than February fifteenth. Any change to such
81 written certification shall be made and submitted, and approved or
82 disapproved, in accordance with the provisions of subparagraph (B) of
83 this subdivision. Such written certification shall provide [(i)] (I) the
84 name, street address and relevant contact information associated with
85 such location, [(ii)] (II) the number of election or primary officials to be
86 appointed by the registrars of voters to serve at such location and the
87 roles of such officials, and [(iii)] (III) a description of the design of such
88 location and a plan for effective conduct of such early voting, and shall
89 include the information required for same-day election registration
90 under subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section 9-19j, as amended by
91 this act. The Secretary shall approve or disapprove such written
92 certification annually not later than [forty-five days prior to the day of
93 an election or a primary] March first. If the Secretary disapproves such
94 certification, the Secretary shall provide, in writing, the reasons for such
95 disapproval and shall issue an order for such corrective action as the
96 Secretary deems necessary, including, but not limited to, the
97 appointment of additional election or primary officials or the alteration
98 of such design or plan. After having received approval of such
99 certification or having complied with any order for corrective action to
100 the Secretary's satisfaction, as applicable, the registrars of voters shall
101 determine the site of such location designated for the conduct of early
102 voting at least thirty-one days prior to an election or a primary. Such
103 location shall not be changed within such period, except, if the
104 municipal clerk and registrars of voters unanimously find that such
105 location has been rendered unusable within such period, such clerk and
106 registrars shall forthwith designate another location for the conduct of
107 early voting to be used in place of the location so rendered unusable and
108 shall give adequate notice that such location has been so changed. The
109 provisions of sections 9-168d and 9-168e shall apply to such location
110 designated for the conduct of early voting.
LCO No. 1561 4 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
111 (B) If, after the registrars of voters annually submit the written
112 certification under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, the registrars
113 make any change to any part of such written certification, such registrars
114 shall submit to the Secretary of the State an updated written
115 certification, in a form and manner prescribed by the Secretary, as soon
116 as practicable but in no case later than seven days after such change. The
117 registrars shall clearly indicate on such updated written certification the
118 information that has changed since the prior submission. The Secretary
119 shall approve or disapprove such updated written certification as soon
120 as practicable but in no case later than seven days after submission
121 thereof. If the Secretary disapproves such updated certification, the
122 Secretary shall provide, in writing, the reasons for such disapproval and
123 shall issue an order for such corrective action as the Secretary deems
124 necessary, in accordance with subparagraph (A) of this subdivision.
125 (2) In any municipality with a population of at least twenty thousand,
126 the legislative body may hold a public hearing on whether to designate
127 any additional location in such municipality for the conduct of early
128 voting, which public hearing, if any, shall be held not later than fifteen
129 days prior to the time for designating any such location set forth in
130 subdivision (1) of this subsection. Any legislative body holding such a
131 public hearing shall properly notice such public hearing not later than
132 ten days prior to such public hearing in a newspaper having general
133 circulation in such municipality and on the Internet web site of the
134 municipality. For any such municipality in which such a public hearing
135 was not held, the legislative body thereof shall determine whether to
136 designate any such additional location and shall notify the Secretary of
137 the State with a detailed explanation for such determination. For any
138 municipality in which such a public hearing was held, not later than
139 three days after the conclusion of such public hearing, the legislative
140 body thereof shall determine whether to designate any such additional
141 location and shall notify the Secretary with a detailed explanation for
142 such determination. If the legislative body determines that any such
143 additional location be designated, the [registrars of voters] legislative
LCO No. 1561 5 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
144 body or, in a municipality where the legislative body is a town meeting,
145 the board of selectmen, shall so designate such additional location and
146 the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall apply to such
147 additional location. The Secretary shall take no action on any detailed
148 explanation submitted under this subdivision with regard to the
149 number of additional locations designated in such a municipality, and
150 shall preserve each such detailed explanation as a public record open to
151 public inspection. For the purposes of this subdivision, "population"
152 means the estimated number of people according to the most recent
153 version of the State Register and Manual prepared pursuant to section
154 3-90.
155 (3) In any municipality containing any campus of a constituent unit,
156 as defined in section 10a-1, with at least one thousand students living in
157 housing that is on such campus or is owned or operated by, or affiliated
158 with, such constituent unit, the registrars of voters of such municipality
159 shall designate an additional location on such campus for the conduct
160 of early voting and the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection
161 shall apply to such additional location.
162 (4) At each location designated for the conduct of early voting, the
163 registrars of voters shall provide to prospective electors during the early
164 voting period the opportunity to apply for same-day election
165 registration, in accordance with the procedures set forth in section 9-19j,
166 as amended by this act, for such application and for the completion and
167 processing of any such application.
168 (5) (A) The registrars of voters shall appoint, for each day on which
169 early voting is conducted, a moderator and such other election or
170 primary officials to serve at each location designated for such conduct.
171 The moderator so appointed shall perform any duty required, and may
172 exercise any power authorized, under this title related to the conduct of
173 early voting at such location. On any such day and solely for purposes
174 related to the conduct of early voting, the registrars of voters of a
175 municipality may, upon agreement, appoint one of the registrars from
LCO No. 1561 6 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
176 such municipality as moderator in accordance with the provisions of
177 subparagraph (B) of this subdivision. The registrars of voters may
178 delegate to each other election or primary official so appointed any of
179 the responsibilities assigned to the registrars of voters. The registrars of
180 voters shall supervise each such official and train each such official to be
181 an early voting election or primary official.
182 (B) Whenever the registrars of voters of a municipality appoint,
183 pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, one of the registrars
184 of such municipality as moderator to serve at a location designated for
185 the conduct of early voting, such registrars of voters shall jointly submit
186 to the Secretary of the State (i) a certification that the registrars of voters
187 of such municipality are in agreement as to such appointment, and (ii)
188 a written plan detailing alternative coverage of the duties normally
189 carried out by the registrar so appointed to ensure that such registrar
190 abstains, on each day in which such registrar serves as moderator, from
191 any such duties that conflict with those of the moderator.
192 (C) Not later than the fourteenth day preceding the commencement
193 of the period of early voting, the registrars of voters shall provide to the
194 Secretary of the State a written report setting forth the name, address
195 and, if available, cellular mobile telephone number of the moderator
196 appointed to serve at each location designated for the conduct of early
197 voting pursuant to this subdivision. Such written report shall be
198 included as part of the written report provided by the registrars to the
199 Secretary under section 9-228a, as amended by this act.
200 (c) Any elector who wishes to vote during a period of early voting at
201 an election or primary, and is eligible to so vote at such election or
202 primary, shall (1) appear in person at such times as provided in
203 subsection (c) of section 9-174, at the location designated by the
204 registrars of voters for early voting, and (2) identify such elector as
205 required by subsection (a) of section 9-261. [, and (3) declare under oath
206 that such elector has not previously voted in such election or primary,
207 as provided in subsection (e) of this section.]
LCO No. 1561 7 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
208 (d) If the registrars of voters determine that an elector is eligible to
209 vote in the election or primary, the registrars of voters shall check the
210 state-wide centralized voter registration system before allowing such
211 elector to cast an early voting ballot as provided in subsection (e) of this
212 section.
213 (1) If the registrars of voters determine that the elector has not already
214 voted, or if there is no report that the elector has already voted, the
215 registrars shall allow such elector to vote.
216 (2) If the registrars of voters believe that the elector may have already
217 voted, such matter shall be reviewed by the registrars of voters. After
218 completion of such review, if a resolution of the matter cannot be made
219 and such elector claims to have neither in fact voted nor offered to vote
220 in person or by absentee ballot, such elector may request a challenged
221 ballot in accordance with section 9-232d and may cast such challenged
222 ballot in accordance with section 9-232e. Such matter shall be reported
223 to the State Elections Enforcement Commission, which shall conduct an
224 investigation of the matter. The provisions of section 9-232f shall apply
225 to any challenged ballot cast under this subdivision.
226 (e) If the elector is allowed to vote, the registrars of voters shall
227 provide such elector with an early voting ballot, [and early voting
228 envelope and shall make a record of such issuance. The] shall make a
229 record of such issuance and shall announce to such elector the voting
230 district in which such elector resides and the ballot, corresponding to
231 such voting district, that such elector should properly receive. Prior to
232 marking the early voting ballot, the elector shall complete [an] a printed
233 affirmation [printed upon the back of the early voting envelope] in a log
234 book provided by the registrars of voters and shall declare under oath
235 that the [voter] elector has not previously voted in the election or
236 primary. The Secretary of the State shall prescribe the form of such log
237 book and shall make a sample thereof available on the Internet web site
238 of the office of the Secretary of the State. Such printed affirmation shall
239 be in the form substantially as follows and signed by the [voter] elector:
LCO No. 1561 8 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
240 AFFIRMATION: I, the undersigned, do hereby state, under penalty
241 of false statement (perjury), that:
242 1. I am the elector appearing in person to vote early at [an] this
243 election or primary. [prior to the day of such election or primary.]
244 2. I am eligible to vote in [the] this election or primary. [indicated for
245 today.]
246 3. I have identified myself to the satisfaction of the registrars of voters.
247 4. I have not voted in person or by absentee ballot and I will not vote
248 otherwise than by this ballot at this election or primary.
249 5. I have received an early voting ballot for the purpose of [so] voting.
250 …. (Signature of voter)
251 (f) The elector shall forthwith mark the early voting ballot in the
252 presence of the registrars of voters in such a manner that the registrars
253 of voters shall not know how the early voting ballot is marked. The
254 elector shall place the early voting ballot [in the early voting ballot
255 envelope provided and deposit such envelope in a secured early voting
256 ballot depository receptacle] into the voting tabulator. At the conclusion
257 of each day during the early voting period, the registrars of voters shall
258 [transport such receptacle containing] (1) publicly open the voting
259 tabulator, secure and seal such day's early voting ballots [to the
260 municipal clerk, who shall] in a secure receptacle and retain and
261 securely store such ballots in as near a manner as possible to that for the
262 retention and secure storage of [absentee] ballots cast at polling places
263 under section 9-261, as provided in subsection (g) of this section, except
264 that, if such manner is not practicable, then such early voting ballots
265 shall be retained and securely stored as provided in an alternate plan
266 submitted by the registrars of voters to the Secretary of the State and
267 approved by the Secretary, [. On the day of the election or primary, the
268 early voting ballots shall be delivered to the registrars of voters for the
LCO No. 1561 9 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
269 purpose of counting such ballots. A section of the head moderator's
270 return shall show the number of early voting ballots received from
271 electors. The registrars of voters shall seal a copy of the vote tally for
272 early voting ballots in a depository envelope with the early voting
273 ballots and store such early voting depository envelope with the other
274 election or primary results materials. The early voting depository
275 envelope shall be preserved by the registrars of voters for the period of
276 time required to preserve counted ballots for elections or primaries] and
277 (2) secure the voting tabulator in a locked area.
278 (g) Except as provided in section 9-163bb, as amended by this act, the
279 provisions of this title and any regulation adopted under this title
280 concerning procedures relating to the custody, control and counting of
281 [absentee] ballots cast at polling places under section 9-261 shall apply,
282 as nearly as possible, to the custody, control and counting of early voting
283 ballots under this section. A section of the head moderator's return shall
284 show the number of early voting ballots received from electors.
285 (h) (1) No person shall solicit on behalf of or in opposition to any
286 candidate or on behalf of or in opposition to any question being
287 submitted at the election or primary, or loiter or peddle or offer any
288 advertising matter, ballot or circular to another person within a radius
289 of seventy-five feet of any outside entrance in use as an entry to any
290 building that contains any location designated by the registrars of voters
291 for early voting or in any corridor, passageway or other approach
292 leading from any such outside entrance to any such location or in any
293 room opening upon any such corridor, passageway or approach.
294 (2) Except as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection, no person
295 shall be allowed within any location designated by the registrars of
296 voters for early voting for any purpose other than casting such person's
297 vote, except (A) primary officials under section 9-436, (B) election
298 officials under section 9-258, including (i) a municipal clerk or registrar
299 of voters, who is a candidate for the same office, and (ii) a deputy
300 registrar of voters, who is a candidate for the office of registrar of voters,
LCO No. 1561 10 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
301 performing such official's duties, and (C) unofficial checkers under
302 section 9-235.
303 (3) A person, including any candidate or any campaign or party
304 employee or volunteer, may be within the seventy-five-foot radius
305 described in subdivision (1) of this subsection (A) only for purposes
306 related to the performance of such person's official duties or to the
307 conduct of government business within such radius, (B) only for as long
308 as necessary to perform such duties or conduct such business, and (C)
309 provided such person is not engaged in any conduct described in
310 subdivision (1) of this subsection.
311 (i) The provisions of subsections (a) to (h), inclusive, of this section
312 shall not apply to any primary held for the purpose of choosing town
313 committee members.
314 (j) No election or primary official shall perform services for any party
315 or candidate on any day during the period of early voting on which such
316 election or primary official is appointed to serve under this section, nor
317 appear at any political party headquarters prior to the hour prescribed
318 under subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (c) of section 9-174, as
319 applicable, for the closing of the location designated for early voting on
320 such day.
321 Sec. 2. Section 9-163bb of the general statutes is repealed and the
322 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
323 (a) [Early voting ballots received by the municipal clerk prior to the
324 day of an election or primary, and same-day] (1) Same-day election
325 registration ballots received by the municipal clerk prior to the day of a
326 regular election [,] shall be delivered by the municipal clerk to the
327 registrars between six o'clock a.m. and ten o'clock a.m. on the day of the
328 regular election. [or primary.]
329 [(b)] (2)The ballot counters for such [early voting ballots and] same-
330 day election registration ballots shall proceed to the central counting
LCO No. 1561 11 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
331 location or to the respective polling places when counting is to take
332 place pursuant to subsection (b) of section 9-147a at the time, between
333 six o'clock a.m. and ten o'clock a.m. on the day of the regular election,
334 [or primary,] designated by the registrars of voters. At the time such
335 ballots are delivered to the ballot counters pursuant to subsection (a) of
336 this section, the ballot counters shall perform any checking of such
337 ballots and proceed, as nearly as possible, as provided in section 9-150a,
338 as amended by this act.
339 (b) Upon the close of the polls on the day of an election or primary,
340 the moderator for the location designated for the conduct of early
341 voting, in the presence of the other election or primary officials at such
342 location, shall immediately lock the voting tabulator for early voting
343 ballots against voting and immediately cause the vote totals for all
344 candidates and questions to be produced.
345 Sec. 3. Section 9-19j of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
346 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
347 2026):
348 (a) As used in this section:
349 (1) "Election day" means the day on which a regular election, as
350 defined in section 9-1, as amended by this act, is held; and
351 (2) "Same-day election registration" means admission as an elector
352 during the period of early voting at a regular election, as provided in
353 section 9-163aa, as amended by this act, or on election day.
354 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, a person who (1)
355 is (A) not an elector, or (B) an elector registered in a municipality who
356 wishes to change such elector's registration to another municipality
357 pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (2) of subsection (e) of this
358 section, and (2) meets the eligibility requirements under subsection (a)
359 of section 9-12, may apply for same-day election registration pursuant
360 to the provisions of this section.
LCO No. 1561 12 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
361 (c) (1) (A) The registrars of voters shall designate a location for the
362 completion and processing of same-day election registrations on
363 election day, provided [(A)] (i) the registrars of voters have access to the
364 state-wide centralized voter registration system from such location, and
365 [(B)] (ii) such location is certified in writing to the Secretary of the State.
366 [not later than forty-five days before election day.] The written
367 certification under subparagraph [(B)] (A)(ii) of this subdivision shall
368 [(i) include] be submitted annually by the registrars of voters to the
369 Secretary not later than February fifteenth as part of such registrars'
370 submission under subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of subsection (b)
371 of section 9-163aa, as amended by this act. Any change to such written
372 certification shall be made and submitted, and approved or
373 disapproved, in accordance with the provisions of subparagraph (B) of
374 this subdivision. Such written certification shall provide (I) the name,
375 street address and relevant contact information associated with such
376 location, [(ii) list the name and address of each election official who
377 shall] (II) the number of election officials to be appointed by the
378 registrars of voters to serve at such location [, if any] and the roles of
379 such officials, and [(iii) provide] (III) a description of the design of such
380 location and a plan for effective completion and processing of [such
381 applications] same-day election registrations. The Secretary shall
382 approve or disapprove such written certification annually not later than
383 [twenty-nine days before election day] March first and may require the
384 registrars of voters to appoint one or more additional election officials
385 or alter such design or plan.
386 (B) If, after the registrars of voters annually submit the written
387 certification under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, the registrars
388 make any change to any part of such written certification, including for
389 any additional location designated pursuant to subdivision (2) of this
390 subsection, such registrars shall submit to the Secretary of the State an
391 updated written certification, in a form and manner prescribed by the
392 Secretary, as soon as practicable but in no case later than seven days
393 after such change. The registrars shall clearly indicate on such updated
LCO No. 1561 13 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
394 written certification the information that has changed since the prior
395 submission. The Secretary shall approve or disapprove such updated
396 written certification as soon as practicable but in no case later than seven
397 days after submission thereof. If the Secretary disapproves such
398 updated certification, the Secretary shall provide, in writing, the reasons
399 for such disapproval and shall issue an order for such corrective action
400 as the Secretary deems necessary, in accordance with subparagraph (A)
401 of this subdivision.
402 (2) The legislative body of the municipality may apply to the
403 Secretary of the State not later than seventy-four days before election
404 day, in a form and manner prescribed by the Secretary, to designate any
405 additional location for the completion and processing of same-day
406 election [registration applications] registrations on election day. The
407 Secretary shall approve or disapprove such application not later than
408 fifty-nine days before election day. If the Secretary approves such
409 application, the registrars of voters may so designate any such
410 additional location. The provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection
411 shall apply to any such additional location.
412 (3) (A) The registrars of voters shall appoint, for each day on which
413 same-day election registrations are completed and processed, a
414 moderator and such other election officials to serve at each location
415 designated for such completion and processing. The moderator so
416 appointed shall perform any duty required, and may exercise any
417 power authorized, under this title related to the completion and
418 processing of same-day election registrations at such location. On any
419 such day and solely for purposes related to the completion and
420 processing of same-day election registrations, the registrars of voters of
421 a municipality may, upon agreement, appoint one of the registrars from
422 such municipality as moderator in accordance with the provisions of
423 subparagraph (B) of this subdivision. The registrars of voters may
424 delegate to each other election official so appointed [pursuant to
425 subdivision (1) of this subsection] any of the responsibilities assigned to
426 the registrars of voters. The registrars of voters shall supervise each such
LCO No. 1561 14 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
427 election official and train each such official to be a same-day election
428 registration election official.
429 (B) Whenever the registrars of voters of a municipality appoint,
430 pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, one of the registrars
431 of such municipality as moderator to serve at a location designated for
432 the completion and processing of same-day election registrations, such
433 registrars of voters shall jointly submit to the Secretary of the State (i) a
434 certification that the registrars of voters of such municipality are in
435 agreement as to such appointment, and (ii) a written plan detailing
436 alternative coverage of the duties normally carried out by the registrar
437 so appointed to ensure that such registrar abstains, on each day in which
438 such registrar serves as moderator, from any such duties that conflict
439 with those of the moderator.
440 (C) Not later than the fourteenth day preceding the commencement
441 of the period of early voting prior to election day, the registrars of voters
442 shall provide to the Secretary of the State a written report setting forth
443 the name, address and, if available, cellular mobile telephone number of
444 the moderator appointed to serve at each location designated for the
445 completion and processing of same-day election registrations pursuant
446 to this subdivision. Such written report shall be included as part of the
447 written report provided by the registrars to the Secretary under section
448 9-228a, as amended by this act.
449 (d) Any person applying for same-day election registration under the
450 provisions of this section shall make application in accordance with the
451 provisions of section 9-20, provided (1) (A) on election day, the applicant
452 shall appear in person not later than eight o'clock p.m., in accordance
453 with subsection (b) of section 9-174, at the location designated by the
454 registrars of voters for same-day election registration, and (B) during the
455 period of early voting prior to election day, the applicant shall appear
456 in person at such times as provided in subdivision (1) of subsection (c)
457 of section 9-174, at such location, (2) an applicant who is a student
458 enrolled at an institution of higher education may submit a current
LCO No. 1561 15 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
459 photo identification card issued by such institution in lieu of the
460 identification required by section 9-20, and (3) the applicant shall
461 declare under oath that the applicant has not previously voted in the
462 election, as provided in subsection (f) of this section. If the information
463 that the applicant is required to provide under section 9-20 and this
464 section does not include proof of the applicant's residential address, the
465 applicant shall also [(i)] (A) submit identification that shows the
466 applicant's bona fide residence address, including, but not limited to, a
467 learner's permit issued under section 14-36 or a utility bill that has the
468 applicant's name and current address and that has a due date that is not
469 later than thirty days after the election or, in the case of a student
470 enrolled at an institution of higher education, a registration or fee
471 statement from such institution that has the applicant's name and
472 current address, or [(ii)] (B) prove the applicant's bona fide residence
473 address by the testimony under oath of at least one elector.
474 (e) If the registrars of voters determine that an applicant satisfies the
475 application requirements set forth in subsection (d) of this section, the
476 registrars of voters shall check the state-wide centralized voter
477 registration system before admitting such applicant as an elector.
478 (1) If the registrars of voters determine that the applicant is not
479 already an elector, the registrars of voters shall admit the applicant as
480 an elector and the privileges of an elector shall attach immediately.
481 (2) If the registrars of voters determine that such applicant is an
482 elector in another municipality and such applicant wants to change the
483 municipality in which the applicant is an elector, notwithstanding the
484 provisions of section 9-21, the registrars of voters of the municipality in
485 which such elector now seeks to register shall immediately notify the
486 registrars of voters in such other municipality that such elector is
487 changing the municipality in which the applicant is an elector. The
488 registrars of voters in such other municipality shall notify the election
489 officials in such municipality to remove such elector from the official
490 voter list of such municipality. Such election officials shall cross through
LCO No. 1561 16 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
491 the elector's name on such official voter list and mark "off" next to such
492 elector's name on such official voter list.
493 (A) If it is reported that such applicant already voted in such other
494 municipality, the registrars of voters of such other municipality shall
495 immediately notify the registrars of voters of the municipality in which
496 such elector now seeks to register. In such event, such elector shall not
497 receive a same-day election registration ballot from the registrars of
498 voters of the municipality in which such elector now seeks to register.
499 For any such elector, the same-day election registration process shall
500 cease in the municipality in which such elector now seeks to register and
501 such matter shall be reviewed by the registrars of voters in the
502 municipality in which such elector now seeks to register. After
503 completion of such review, if a resolution of the matter cannot be made,
504 such matter shall be reported to the State Elections Enforcement
505 Commission which shall conduct an investigation of the matter.
506 (B) If there is no such report that such applicant already voted in the
507 other municipality, the registrars of voters of the municipality in which
508 the applicant seeks to register shall admit the applicant as an elector and
509 the privileges of an elector shall attach immediately.
510 (f) If the applicant is admitted as an elector, the registrars of voters
511 shall provide the elector with a same-day election registration ballot and
512 same-day election registration envelope and shall make a record of such
513 issuance. The elector shall complete an affirmation imprinted upon the
514 back of the same-day election registration envelope and shall declare
515 under oath that the applicant has not previously voted in the election.
516 The affirmation shall be in the form substantially as follows and signed
517 by the [voter] elector:
518 AFFIRMATION: I, the undersigned, do hereby state, under penalty
519 of false statement, (perjury) that:
520 1. I am the person admitted here as an elector in the town indicated.
LCO No. 1561 17 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
521 2. I am eligible to vote in the election indicated for today in the town
522 indicated.
523 3. The information on my voter registration card is correct and
524 complete.
525 4. I reside at the address that I have given to the registrars of voters.
526 5. If previously registered at another location, I have provided such
527 address to the registrars of voters and hereby request cancellation of
528 such prior registration.
529 6. I have not voted in person or by absentee ballot and I will not vote
530 otherwise than by this ballot at this election.
531 7. I completed an application for a same-day election registration
532 ballot and received a same-day election registration ballot.
533 .... (Signature of voter)
534 (g) The elector shall forthwith mark the same-day election
535 registration ballot in the presence of the registrars of voters in such a
536 manner that the registrars of voters shall not know how the same-day
537 election registration ballot is marked. The elector shall place the same-
538 day election registration ballot in the same-day election registration
539 ballot envelope provided, and deposit such envelope in a secured same-
540 day election registration ballot depository receptacle. At the conclusion
541 of each day during the early voting period, the registrars of voters shall
542 transport such receptacle containing such day's same-day election
543 registration ballots to the municipal clerk, who shall retain and securely
544 store such ballots in as near a manner as possible to that for the retention
545 and secure storage of absentee ballots, as provided in subsection (h) of
546 this section, except that, if such manner is not practicable, such same-
547 day election registration ballots shall be retained and securely stored as
548 provided in an alternate plan submitted by the registrars of voters to the
549 Secretary of the State and approved by the Secretary. On election day,
LCO No. 1561 18 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
550 the previously retained and securely stored same-day election
551 registration ballots shall be delivered to the registrars of voters and, at
552 the time designated by the registrars of voters and noticed to election
553 officials, the registrars of voters shall transport such receptacle
554 containing the same-day election registration ballots received on such
555 election day to the central location or polling place, pursuant to
556 subsection (b) of section 9-147a, where absentee ballots are counted and
557 such same-day election registration ballots shall be counted by the
558 election officials present at such central location or polling place. A
559 section of the head moderator's return shall show the number of same-
560 day election registration ballots received from electors. The registrars of
561 voters shall seal a copy of the vote tally for same-day election
562 registration ballots in a depository envelope with the same-day election
563 registration ballots and store such same-day election registration
564 depository envelope with the other election results materials. The same-
565 day election registration depository envelope shall be preserved by the
566 registrars of voters for the period of time required to preserve counted
567 ballots for elections.
568 (h) Except as provided in section 9-163bb, as amended by this act, the
569 provisions of this title and any regulation adopted under this title
570 concerning procedures relating to the custody, control and counting of
571 absentee ballots shall apply, as nearly as possible, to the custody, control
572 and counting of same-day election registration ballots under this
573 section.
574 (i) After the acceptance of a same-day election registration, the
575 registrars of voters shall forthwith send a registration confirmation
576 notice to the residential address of each applicant who was admitted as
577 an elector on election day or during the period of early voting prior to
578 election day under this section. Such confirmation shall be sent by first
579 class mail with instructions on the envelope that it be returned if not
580 deliverable at the address shown on the envelope. If a confirmation
581 notice is returned undelivered, the registrars shall forthwith take the
582 necessary action in accordance with section 9-35 or 9-43, as applicable,
LCO No. 1561 19 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
583 notwithstanding the May first deadline in section 9-35.
584 (j) (1) No person shall solicit on behalf of or in opposition to any
585 candidate or on behalf of or in opposition to any question being
586 submitted at the election, or loiter or peddle or offer any advertising
587 matter, ballot or circular to another person within a radius of seventy-
588 five feet of any outside entrance in use as an entry to any building that
589 contains any location designated by the registrars of voters for same-
590 day election registration balloting or in any corridor, passageway or
591 other approach leading from any such outside entrance to any such
592 location or in any room opening upon any such corridor, passageway
593 or approach.
594 (2) Except as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection, no person
595 shall be allowed within any location designated by the registrars of
596 voters for same-day election registration balloting for any purpose other
597 than casting such person's vote, except (A) primary officials under
598 section 9-436, (B) election officials under section 9-258, including (i) a
599 municipal clerk or registrar of voters, who is a candidate for the same
600 office, and (ii) a deputy registrar of voters, who is a candidate for the
601 office of registrar of voters, performing such official's duties, and (C)
602 unofficial checkers under section 9-235.
603 (3) A person, including any candidate or any campaign or party
604 employee or volunteer, may be within the seventy-five-foot radius
605 described in subdivision (1) of this subsection (A) only for purposes
606 related to the performance of such person's official duties or to the
607 conduct of government business within such radius, (B) only for as long
608 as necessary to perform such duties or conduct such business, and (C)
609 provided such person is not engaged in any conduct described in
610 subdivision (1) of this subsection.
611 (k) No election official shall perform services for any party or
612 candidate on any day on which such election official is appointed to
613 serve under this section, nor appear at any political party headquarters
LCO No. 1561 20 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
614 prior to the hour prescribed under subsection (b) or subdivision (1) of
615 subsection (c) of section 9-174, as applicable, for the closing of the
616 location designated for same-day election registration on such day.
617 Sec. 4. Section 9-228a of the general statutes is repealed and the
618 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
619 (a) [The] Not later than the thirty-first day preceding the day of each
620 municipal, state or federal election or primary, the registrars of voters of
621 each municipality shall [, not later than thirty-one days prior to each
622 municipal, state or federal election or primary,] certify to the Secretary
623 of the State, in writing, the location of each polling place that will be
624 used for such election or primary. Such certification shall detail the
625 name, address, relevant contact information and corresponding federal,
626 state and municipal districts associated with each polling place used for
627 such election or primary.
628 (b) [The] Not later than the fourteenth day preceding the
629 commencement of the period of early voting at each municipal, state or
630 federal election or primary, in accordance with the provisions of
631 subsection (a) of section 9-163aa, as amended by this act, the registrars
632 of voters of each municipality shall [, prior to each municipal, state or
633 federal election or primary,] provide a written report to the Secretary of
634 the State setting forth the names, [and] addresses and, if available,
635 cellular mobile telephone numbers of each moderator for each (1)
636 polling place location disclosed pursuant to subsection (a) of this
637 section, (2) location designated for the conduct of early voting pursuant
638 to subsection (b) of section 9-163aa, as amended by this act, and (3)
639 location designated for the completion and processing of same-day
640 election registrations pursuant to subsection (c) of section 9-19j, as
641 amended by this act.
642 (c) The Secretary of the State shall have the authority to disqualify
643 any moderator appointed by the registrars of voters if, after consultation
644 with both registrars of voters, the Secretary determines such moderator
LCO No. 1561 21 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
645 has committed material misconduct, material neglect of duty or material
646 incompetence in the discharge of his or her duties as a moderator. If the
647 Secretary disqualifies a moderator, the Secretary shall share his or her
648 findings upon which the disqualification was based with the registrars
649 of voters.
650 Sec. 5. Section 9-56 of the general statutes is repealed and the
651 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
652 Except as otherwise provided in the case of an elector whose name
653 has not been placed on or has been removed from the enrollment list
654 under section 9-59, 9-60, 9-61 or 9-62, any elector not enrolled on any
655 enrollment list may at any time make a written and signed application
656 for enrollment to the registrars of voters on an application form for
657 admission as an elector, in accordance with the requirements of this
658 section. The application shall be effective as of the date it is filed with
659 the registrars of voters of the town of residence of the applicant and any
660 person making application for enrollment in such manner shall
661 immediately be entitled to the privileges of party enrollment unless the
662 application for enrollment (1) is filed in person by the applicant with the
663 registrars of voters after twelve o'clock noon on the last business day
664 before a primary, in which case he shall be entitled to the privileges of
665 party enrollment immediately after the primary, (2) is otherwise filed
666 with the registrar after the [fifth] eighteenth day before the primary, in
667 which case he shall be entitled to the privileges of party enrollment
668 immediately after the primary, except as provided in section 9-23a, or
669 (3) is filed with the registrars of voters after 5:00 p.m. on the last business
670 day before a caucus or convention, in which case he shall be entitled to
671 the privileges of party enrollment immediately after the caucus or
672 convention. The application shall be signed or initialed by the registrar,
673 deputy, assistant or registrar's clerk receiving it, or by such other
674 personnel as such registrar or deputy may appoint for the purpose,
675 showing the date when such application is received and, in the case of
676 an applicant not immediately eligible under section 9-59, 9-60, 9-61 or 9-
677 62 to the privileges accompanying enrollment in the party named in his
LCO No. 1561 22 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
678 application, the date upon which such applicant becomes so eligible. In
679 municipalities divided into voting districts in which an enrollment
680 session is held in each district thereof under section 9-51, application for
681 enrollment shall be made to the registrar or assistant registrar, as the
682 case may be, in the voting district in which such elector is entitled to
683 vote at the time of making such application. If any registrar or assistant
684 registrar fails to add any name to any such list on written application or
685 adds any name to any such list except as herein provided, he shall be
686 guilty of a class D misdemeanor.
687 Sec. 6. Subsection (d) of section 9-229 of the general statutes is
688 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
689 2026):
690 (d) If the person designated as moderator is unable to serve for any
691 reason, a certified alternate moderator shall serve as moderator. If such
692 certified alternate moderator is not called upon to serve as moderator,
693 he shall serve in another capacity as an election official on election or
694 primary day. If any town or voting district lacks a moderator due to the
695 death, disability or withdrawal of a certified moderator or alternate
696 moderator, or due to the disqualification of a moderator for any reason,
697 including failure to attend an instructional session as required by this
698 section, the registrars of voters shall appoint a new moderator for such
699 town or voting district in the manner provided in this section, except
700 that the registrars shall not appoint as moderator any person who has,
701 in a court of competent jurisdiction, been convicted of or pled guilty or
702 nolo contendere to any (1) felony involving fraud, forgery, larceny,
703 embezzlement or bribery, or (2) criminal offense under this title. Such
704 new moderator shall attend an instructional session and a certification
705 session conducted in accordance with the provisions of this section. If
706 all such sessions have been conducted at the time of appointment of the
707 new moderator, the new moderator shall receive instruction from the
708 registrars who appointed the new moderator.
709 Sec. 7. Section 9-169 of the general statutes is repealed and the
LCO No. 1561 23 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
710 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
711 The legislative body of any town, consolidated town and city or
712 consolidated town and borough may divide and, from time to time,
713 redivide such municipality into voting districts. The registrars of voters
714 of any municipality taking such action shall provide a suitable polling
715 place in each district but, if the registrars fail to agree as to the location
716 of any polling place or places, the legislative body shall determine the
717 location thereof. Polling places to be used in an election shall be
718 determined at least thirty-one days before such election, and such
719 polling places shall not be changed within said period of thirty-one days
720 except that, if the municipal clerk and registrars of voters of a
721 municipality unanimously find that any such polling place within such
722 municipality has been rendered unusable within such period, they shall
723 forthwith designate another polling place to be used in place of the one
724 so rendered unusable and shall give adequate notice that such polling
725 place has been so changed. The registrars of voters shall keep separate
726 lists of the electors residing in each district and shall appoint for each
727 district a moderator in accordance with the provisions of section 9-229,
728 as amended by this act, and such other election officials as are required
729 by law, and shall designate one of the moderators so appointed or any
730 other elector of such town to be the head moderator for the purpose of
731 declaring the results of elections in the whole municipality, except that
732 the registrars shall not appoint as moderator any person who has, in a
733 court of competent jurisdiction, been convicted of or pled guilty or nolo
734 contendere to any (1) felony involving fraud, forgery, larceny,
735 embezzlement or bribery, or (2) criminal offense under this title. The
736 registrars may also designate a deputy head moderator to assist the
737 head moderator in the performance of his duties provided the deputy
738 head moderator and the head moderator shall not be enrolled in the
739 same major party, as defined in subdivision (5) of section 9-372. The
740 selectmen, town clerk, registrars of voters and all other officers of the
741 municipality shall perform the duties required of them by law with
742 respect to elections in each voting district established in accordance with
LCO No. 1561 24 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
743 this section. Voting district lines shall not be drawn by a municipality so
744 as to conflict with the lines of congressional districts, senate districts or
745 assembly districts as established by law, except [(1)] (A) as provided in
746 section 9-169d, and [(2)] (B) that as to municipal elections, any part of a
747 split voting district containing less than two hundred electors may be
748 combined with another voting district adjacent thereto from which all
749 and the same officers are elected at such municipal election. Any change
750 in the boundaries of voting districts made within ninety days prior to
751 any election or primary shall not apply with respect to such election or
752 primary. The provisions of this section shall prevail over any contrary
753 provision of any charter or special act.
754 Sec. 8. Section 9-322a of the general statutes is repealed and the
755 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
756 (a) Not later than forty-eight hours following each regular election,
757 the registrars of voters shall provide the results of the votes cast at such
758 election to the town clerk. Not later than nine o'clock a.m. on the third
759 day following each regular election, the head moderator, registrars of
760 voters and town clerk for each town [divided into voting districts] shall
761 meet to identify any error in the returns. Not later than one o'clock p.m.
762 on the third day following each regular election, the head moderator
763 shall correct any error identified and file an amended return with the
764 Secretary of the State, the town clerk and the registrars of voters.
765 (b) Not later than twenty-one days following each regular state
766 election, the town clerk of each town [divided into voting districts] shall
767 file with the Secretary of the State a consolidated listing, in tabular
768 format, as prescribed by the Secretary of the State, of the official returns
769 [of each such voting district] for all offices voted on at such election,
770 including the total number of votes cast for each candidate, the total
771 number of names on the registry list, and the total number of names
772 checked as having voted. [, in each such district.] The town clerk of such
773 town shall certify that he or she has examined the lists transmitted under
774 this section to determine whether there are any discrepancies between
LCO No. 1561 25 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
775 the total number of votes cast for a candidate at such election in such
776 town, including for any recanvass conducted pursuant to section 9-311,
777 as amended by this act, or 9-311a, and the sum of the votes cast for the
778 same candidate in all voting districts in such town if such town has been
779 divided into voting districts. In the case of any such discrepancy, the
780 town clerk shall notify the head moderator and certify that such
781 discrepancy has been rectified. Each listing filed under this section shall
782 be retained by the Secretary of the State not less than ten years after the
783 date of the election for which it was filed.
784 Sec. 9. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section,
785 "municipality", "government enforcement action", "federal Voting
786 Rights Act" and "protected class" have the same meanings as provided
787 in section 9-368i of the general statutes.
788 (b) The corporation counsel of any municipality that has been subject
789 to any court order or government enforcement action described in
790 subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section 9-368m
791 of the general statutes shall provide to the office of the Secretary of the
792 State all details pertaining to such matter not later than one month after
793 the effective date of this section, the issuance of such court order or the
794 commencement of such government enforcement action, whichever is
795 latest.
796 (c) If an action filed in a court of competent jurisdiction alleges a
797 violation of the provisions of sections 9-368j to 9-368q, inclusive, of the
798 general statutes, the federal Voting Rights Act, any state or federal civil
799 rights law, the fifteenth amendment to the United States Constitution or
800 the fourteenth amendment to the United States Constitution, which
801 violation concerns the right to vote or a pattern, practice or policy of
802 discrimination against any protected class, the party that filed such
803 action shall cause notice of the hearing on such action to be given to the
804 Secretary of the State.
805 Sec. 10. Section 9-388 of the general statutes is repealed and the
LCO No. 1561 26 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
806 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
807 (a) Whenever a convention of a political party is held for the
808 endorsement of candidates for nomination to state or district office, each
809 candidate endorsed at such convention shall file with the Secretary of
810 the State a certificate, signed by him, stating that he was endorsed by
811 such convention, his name as he authorizes it to appear on the ballot, his
812 full residence address and the title and district, if applicable, of the office
813 for which he was endorsed. Such certificate shall be attested by either
814 (1) the chairman or presiding officer, or (2) the secretary of such
815 convention and shall be received by the Secretary of the State not later
816 than four o'clock p.m. on the fourteenth day after the close of such
817 convention. Such certificate shall either be mailed to the Secretary of the
818 State by certified mail, return receipt requested, or delivered in person,
819 in which case a receipt indicating the date and time of delivery shall be
820 provided by the Secretary of the State to the person making delivery. If
821 a certificate of a party's endorsement for a particular state or district
822 office is not received by the Secretary of the State by such time, such
823 certificate shall be invalid and such party, for the purposes of [section 9-
824 416 and section 9-416a] sections 9-416 and 9-416a, shall be deemed to
825 have made no endorsement of any candidate for such office. If
826 applicable, the chairman of a party's state convention shall, forthwith
827 upon the close of such convention, file with the Secretary of the State the
828 names and full residence addresses of persons selected by such
829 convention as the nominees of such party for electors of President and
830 Vice-President of the United States in accordance with the provisions of
831 section 9-175.
832 (b) (1) In the case of a timely filed certificate of a party's endorsement
833 pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, which contains an error or
834 omission that would operate to invalidate such endorsement, the
835 candidate so certified or an individual authorized to act on behalf of
836 such candidate may correct such error or omission by appearing in
837 person at the office of the Secretary of the State not later than four o'clock
838 p.m. on the nineteenth day after the close of the state or district
LCO No. 1561 27 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
839 convention, as applicable, and amending such certificate to make such
840 correction. If such candidate or individual does not appear to so amend
841 such certificate by such time, such certificate shall be invalid and such
842 party, for the purposes of sections 9-416 and 9-416a, shall be deemed to
843 have made no such endorsement.
844 (2) The Secretary of the State may, within the time period specified in
845 subdivision (1) of this subsection, amend a timely filed certificate of a
846 party's endorsement to correct any such error or omission, and shall
847 keep a record of any such amendment made pursuant to this
848 subdivision. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require
849 the Secretary to affirmatively attempt to identify any error or omission
850 in any such certificate.
851 Sec. 11. Subsection (c) of section 9-391 of the general statutes is
852 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
853 passage):
854 (c) (1) Each endorsement of a candidate to run in a primary for the
855 nomination of candidates for a municipal office to be voted upon at a
856 state election shall be made under the provisions of section 9-390 not
857 earlier than the eighty-fourth day or later than the seventy-seventh day
858 preceding the day of such primary. Each certification to be filed under
859 this subsection shall be received by the Secretary of the State not later
860 than four o'clock p.m. on the fourteenth day after the close of the town
861 committee meeting, caucus or convention, as the case may be. If such a
862 certificate of a party's endorsement is not received by the Secretary of
863 the State by such time, such certificate shall be invalid and such party,
864 for the purposes of sections 9-417 and 9-418, shall be deemed to have
865 neither made nor certified any endorsement of any candidate for such
866 office. The candidate so endorsed for a municipal office to be voted upon
867 at a state election, other than the office of justice of the peace, shall file
868 with the Secretary of the State a certificate, signed by that candidate,
869 stating that such candidate was so endorsed, the candidate's name as
870 the candidate authorizes it to appear on the ballot, the candidate's full
LCO No. 1561 28 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
871 street address and the title and district of the office for which the
872 candidate was endorsed. Such certificate may be filed by a candidate
873 whose name appears upon the last-completed enrollment list of such
874 party within the senatorial district within which the candidate is
875 endorsed to run for nomination in the case of the municipal office of
876 state senator, or the assembly district within which the candidate is
877 endorsed to run for nomination in the case of the municipal office of
878 state representative, or the municipality or political subdivision within
879 which the candidate is to run for nomination for other municipal offices
880 to be voted on at a state election. Such certificate shall be attested by
881 either the chairperson or presiding officer or the secretary of the town
882 committee, caucus or convention which made such endorsement. The
883 endorsement of any candidate for the office of justice of the peace shall
884 be certified to the clerk of the municipality by either the chairperson or
885 presiding officer or the secretary of the town committee, caucus or
886 convention, and shall contain the name and street address of each
887 candidate so endorsed and the title of the office for which each such
888 candidate is endorsed. Such certification shall be made on a form
889 prescribed by the Secretary of the State or on such other form as may
890 comply with the provisions of this subsection.
891 (2) (A) In the case of a timely filed certificate of a party's endorsement
892 pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, which contains an error
893 or omission that would operate to invalidate such endorsement, the
894 candidate so certified or an individual authorized to act on behalf of
895 such candidate may correct such error or omission by appearing in
896 person at the office of the Secretary of the State not later than four o'clock
897 p.m. on the nineteenth day after the close of the town committee
898 meeting, caucus or convention, as applicable, and amending such
899 certificate to make such correction. If such candidate or individual does
900 not appear to so amend such certificate by such time, such certificate
901 shall be invalid and such party, for the purposes of sections 9-417 and 9-
902 418, shall be deemed to have neither made nor certified such
903 endorsement.
LCO No. 1561 29 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
904 (B) The Secretary of the State may, within the time period specified in
905 subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, amend a timely filed certificate of
906 a party's endorsement to correct any such error or omission, and shall
907 keep a record of any such amendment made pursuant to this
908 subparagraph. Nothing in this subparagraph shall be construed to
909 require the Secretary to affirmatively attempt to identify any error or
910 omission in any such certificate.
911 Sec. 12. Section 9-400 of the general statutes is repealed and the
912 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
913 (a) A candidacy for nomination by a political party to a state office
914 may be filed by or on behalf of any person whose name appears upon
915 the last-completed enrollment list of such party in any municipality
916 within the state and who has either (1) received at least fifteen per cent
917 of the votes of the convention delegates present and voting on any roll-
918 call vote taken on the endorsement or proposed endorsement of a
919 candidate for such state office, whether or not the party-endorsed
920 candidate for such office received a unanimous vote on the last ballot,
921 or (2) circulated a petition and obtained the signatures of at least two
922 per cent of the enrolled members of such party in the state, in accordance
923 with the provisions of sections 9-404a to 9-404c, inclusive. Candidacies
924 described in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be filed by
925 submitting to the Secretary of the State not later than four o'clock p.m.
926 on the fourteenth day following the close of the state convention, a
927 certificate, signed by such candidate and attested by either (A) the
928 chairman or presiding officer, or (B) the secretary of the convention, that
929 such candidate received at least fifteen per cent of such votes, and that
930 such candidate consents to be a candidate in a primary of such party for
931 such state office. Such certificate shall specify the candidate's name as
932 the candidate authorizes it to appear on the ballot, the candidate's full
933 residence address and the title of the office for which the candidacy is
934 being filed. If such certificate for a state office is not received by the
935 Secretary of the State by such time, such certificate shall be invalid and
936 such person, for the purposes of sections 9-416 and 9-416a, shall be
LCO No. 1561 30 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
937 deemed to have made no valid certification of candidacy for nomination
938 by a political party [for] to such state office. A single such certificate or
939 petition for state office may be filed on behalf of two or more candidates
940 for different state offices who consent to have their names appear on a
941 single row of the primary ballot under subsection (b) of section 9-437.
942 Candidacies described in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be filed
943 by submitting said petition not later than four o'clock p.m. on the sixty-
944 third day preceding the day of the primary for such office to the registrar
945 of voters of the towns in which the respective petition pages were
946 circulated. Each registrar shall file each page of such petition with the
947 Secretary of the State in accordance with the provisions of section 9-404c.
948 A petition filed by or on behalf of a candidate for state office shall be
949 invalid for such candidate if such candidate is certified as the party-
950 endorsed candidate pursuant to section 9-388, as amended by this act,
951 or as receiving at least fifteen per cent of the convention vote for such
952 office pursuant to this subsection. Except as provided in section 9-416a,
953 upon the expiration of the time period for party endorsement and
954 circulation and tabulation of petitions and signatures, if any, if one or
955 more candidacies for such state office have been filed pursuant to the
956 provisions of this section, the Secretary of the State shall notify all town
957 clerks and registrars of voters in accordance with the provisions of
958 section 9-433, that a primary for such state office shall be held in each
959 municipality in accordance with the provisions of section 9-415.
960 (b) A candidacy for nomination by a political party to a district office
961 may be filed by or on behalf of any person whose name appears upon
962 the last-completed enrollment list of such party within the district the
963 person seeks to represent that is in the office of the Secretary of the State
964 at the end of the last day prior to the convention for the party from
965 which the person seeks nomination and who has either (1) received at
966 least fifteen per cent of the votes of the convention delegates present and
967 voting on any roll-call vote taken on the endorsement or proposed
968 endorsement of a candidate for such district office, whether or not the
969 party-endorsed candidate for such office received a unanimous vote on
LCO No. 1561 31 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
970 the last ballot, or (2) circulated a petition and obtained the signatures of
971 at least two per cent of the enrolled members of such party in the district
972 for the district office of representative in Congress, and at least five per
973 cent of the enrolled members of such party in the district for the district
974 offices of state senator, state representative and judge of probate, in
975 accordance with the provisions of sections 9-404a to 9-404c, inclusive.
976 Candidacies described in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be filed
977 by submitting to the Secretary of the State not later than four o'clock
978 p.m. on the fourteenth day following the close of the district convention,
979 a certificate, signed by such candidate and attested by either (A) the
980 chairman or presiding officer, or (B) the secretary of the convention, that
981 such candidate received at least fifteen per cent of such votes, and that
982 the candidate consents to be a candidate in a primary of such party for
983 such district office. Such certificate shall specify the candidate's name as
984 the candidate authorizes it to appear on the ballot, the candidate's full
985 residence address and the title and district of the office for which the
986 candidacy is being filed. If such certificate for a district office is not
987 received by the Secretary of the State by such time, such certificate shall
988 be invalid and such person, for the purposes of sections 9-416 and 9-
989 416a, shall be deemed to have made no valid certification of candidacy
990 for nomination by a political party [for] to such district office.
991 Candidacies described in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be filed
992 by submitting said petition not later than four o'clock p.m. on the sixty-
993 third day preceding the day of the primary for such office to the registrar
994 of voters of the towns in which the respective petition pages were
995 circulated. Each registrar shall file each page of such petition with the
996 Secretary in accordance with the provisions of section 9-404c. A petition
997 may only be filed by or on behalf of a candidate for the district office of
998 state senator, state representative or judge of probate who is not certified
999 as the party-endorsed candidate pursuant to section 9-388, as amended
1000 by this act, or as receiving at least fifteen per cent of the convention vote
1001 for such office pursuant to this subsection. A petition filed by or on
1002 behalf of a candidate for the district office of representative in Congress
1003 shall be invalid if said candidate is certified as the party-endorsed
LCO No. 1561 32 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1004 candidate pursuant to section 9-388, as amended by this act, or as
1005 receiving at least fifteen per cent of the convention vote for such office
1006 pursuant to this subsection. Except as provided in section 9-416a, upon
1007 the expiration of the time period for party endorsement and circulation
1008 and tabulation of petitions and signatures, if any, if one or more
1009 candidacies for such district office have been filed pursuant to the
1010 provisions of this section, the Secretary of the State shall notify all town
1011 clerks within the district, in accordance with the provisions of section 9-
1012 433, that a primary for such district office shall be held in each
1013 municipality and each part of a municipality within the district in
1014 accordance with the provisions of section 9-415.
1015 (c) (1) In the case of a timely filed certificate of candidacy for
1016 nomination by a political party pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this
1017 section, which contains an error or omission that would operate to
1018 invalidate such candidacy for nomination, the person so certified or an
1019 agent of such person may correct such error or omission by appearing
1020 in person at the office of the Secretary of the State not later than four
1021 o'clock p.m. on the nineteenth day after the close of the state or district
1022 convention, as applicable, and amending such certificate to make such
1023 correction, provided neither failure of such person to timely file such
1024 certificate pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section nor failure of
1025 the chairperson, presiding officer or secretary of the convention to attest
1026 such certificate shall be an error or omission that may be corrected
1027 pursuant to this subsection. If such person or agent does not appear to
1028 so amend such certificate by such time, such certificate shall be invalid
1029 and such person, for the purposes of sections 9-416 and 9-416a, shall be
1030 deemed to have made no valid certification of candidacy for nomination
1031 by a political party. As used in this subsection, "agent" means an
1032 individual authorized to act on behalf of a person.
1033 (2) The Secretary of the State may, within the time period specified in
1034 subdivision (1) of this subsection, amend a timely filed certificate of
1035 candidacy for nomination to correct any such error or omission, and
1036 shall keep a record of any such amendment made pursuant to this
LCO No. 1561 33 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1037 subdivision. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require
1038 the Secretary to affirmatively attempt to identify any error or omission
1039 in any such certificate.
1040 [(c)] (d) For the purposes of this section, the number of enrolled
1041 members of a party shall be determined by the latest enrollment records
1042 in the office of the Secretary of the State prior to the earliest date that
1043 primary petitions were available. The names of electors on the inactive
1044 registry list compiled under section 9-35 shall not be counted for
1045 purposes of computing the number of petition signatures required
1046 under this section, as provided in section 9-35c.
1047 [(d)] (e) On the last day for filing primary petition candidacies in
1048 accordance with the provisions of this section, the office or office
1049 facilities of the registrars of voters shall open not later than one o'clock
1050 p.m., and remain open until at least four o'clock p.m., and such
1051 registrars or the deputy or assistant registrars shall be present.
1052 Sec. 13. Section 9-452 of the general statutes is repealed and the
1053 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
1054 (a) All minor parties nominating candidates for any elective office
1055 shall make such nominations and certify and file a list of such
1056 nominations, as required by this section, not later than the sixty-second
1057 day prior to the day of the election at which such candidates are to be
1058 voted for. A list of nominees in printed or typewritten form that includes
1059 each candidate's name as authorized by each candidate to appear on the
1060 ballot, the signature of each candidate, the full street address of each
1061 candidate and the title and district of the office for which each candidate
1062 is nominated shall be certified by the presiding officer of the committee,
1063 meeting or other authority making such nomination and shall be filed
1064 by such presiding officer with the Secretary of the State, in the case of
1065 any state, district or municipal office to be voted upon at a state election,
1066 or with the clerk of the municipality, in the case of any municipal office
1067 to be voted upon at a municipal election, not later than the sixty-second
LCO No. 1561 34 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1068 day prior to the day of the election. The registrars of voters of such
1069 municipality shall promptly verify and correct the names on any such
1070 list filed with him, or the names of nominees forwarded to the clerk of
1071 the municipality by the Secretary of the State, in accordance with the
1072 registry list of such municipality and endorse the same as having been
1073 so verified and corrected. For the purposes of this section, a list of
1074 nominations shall be deemed to be filed when it is received by the
1075 Secretary of the State or clerk of the municipality, as appropriate. If such
1076 certificate of a party's nomination is not received by the Secretary of the
1077 State or clerk of the municipality, as appropriate, by such time, such
1078 certificate shall be invalid and such party, for purposes of sections 9-460,
1079 9-461 and 9-462, shall be deemed to have neither made nor certified any
1080 nomination of any candidate for such office. A candidacy for
1081 nomination by a minor party to a district or municipal office may be
1082 filed on behalf of any person whose name appears on the last-completed
1083 registry list of the district or municipality represented by such office, as
1084 the case may be. A candidacy for nomination by a minor party to a state
1085 office may be filed on behalf of any person whose name appears on the
1086 last-completed registry list of the state.
1087 (b) (1) In the case of a timely filed certificate of nomination for any
1088 state, district or municipal office to be voted upon at a state election
1089 pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, which contains an error or
1090 omission that would operate to invalidate such nomination, the
1091 candidate so certified or an individual authorized to act on behalf of
1092 such candidate may correct such error or omission by appearing in
1093 person at the office of the Secretary of the State not later than four o'clock
1094 p.m. on the fifty-seventh day prior to the day of the election and
1095 amending such certificate to make such correction, provided neither
1096 failure of the presiding officer of the committee, meeting or other
1097 authority to timely file such certificate pursuant to subsection (a) of this
1098 section nor failure of the candidate to sign such certificate shall be an
1099 error or omission that may be corrected pursuant to this subsection. If
1100 such candidate or individual does not appear to so amend such
LCO No. 1561 35 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1101 certificate by such time, such certificate shall be invalid and such party,
1102 for the purposes of sections 9-460, 9-461 and 9-462, shall be deemed to
1103 have neither made nor certified any such nomination.
1104 (2) The Secretary of the State may, within the time period specified in
1105 subdivision (1) of this subsection, amend a timely filed certificate of
1106 nomination to correct any such error or omission, and shall keep a
1107 record of any such amendment made pursuant to this subdivision.
1108 Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require the Secretary
1109 to affirmatively attempt to identify any error or omission in any such
1110 certificate.
1111 Sec. 14. Section 9-250 of the general statutes is repealed and the
1112 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
1113 (a) Ballots shall be printed in plain clear type and on material of such
1114 size as will fit the tabulator, and shall be furnished by the registrar of
1115 voters. The size and style of the type used to print the name of a political
1116 party on a ballot shall be identical with the size and style of the type
1117 used to print the names of all other political parties appearing on such
1118 ballot. The name of each major party candidate for a municipal office, as
1119 defined in section 9-372, except for the municipal offices of state senator
1120 and state representative, shall appear on the ballot as authorized by each
1121 candidate. The name of each major party candidate for a state or district
1122 office, as defined in section 9-372, or for the municipal office of state
1123 senator or state representative shall appear on the ballot as it appears on
1124 the certificate or statement of consent filed under section 9-388, as
1125 amended by this act, subsection (b) of section 9-391, or section 9-400, as
1126 amended by this act, or 9-409. The name of each minor party candidate
1127 shall appear on the ballot as authorized by each candidate. The name of
1128 each nominating petition candidate shall appear on the ballot as it is
1129 verified by the town clerk on the application filed under section 9-453b.
1130 The size and style of the type used to print the name of a candidate on a
1131 ballot shall be identical with the size and style of the type used to print
1132 the names of all other candidates appearing on such ballot. Such ballot
LCO No. 1561 36 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1133 shall contain the names of the offices and the names of the candidates
1134 arranged thereon. The names of the political parties and party
1135 designations shall be arranged on the ballots and followed by the word
1136 "party", either in columns or horizontal rows as set forth in section 9-
1137 249a, immediately adjacent to the column or row occupied by the
1138 candidate or candidates of such political party or organization. The
1139 ballot shall be printed in such manner as to indicate how many
1140 candidates the elector may vote for each office, provided in the case of a
1141 town adopting the provisions of section 9-204a, such ballot shall indicate
1142 the maximum number of candidates who may be elected to such office
1143 from any party. If two or more candidates are to be elected to the same
1144 office for different terms, the term for which each is nominated shall be
1145 printed on the official ballot as a part of the title of the office. If, at any
1146 election, one candidate is to be elected for a full term and another to fill
1147 a vacancy, the official ballot containing the names of the candidates in
1148 the foregoing order shall, as a part of the title of the office, designate the
1149 term which such candidates are severally nominated to fill. No column,
1150 under the name of any political party or independent organization, shall
1151 be printed on any official ballot, which contains more candidates for any
1152 office than the number for which an elector may vote for that office.
1153 (b) Not later than ten days prior to the commencement of the period
1154 of early voting at an election, the registrars of voters of each
1155 municipality shall file with the Secretary of the State, for each voting
1156 district in such municipality, the official ballot to be used for such voting
1157 district. No such official ballot shall be used at any election unless it has
1158 been approved by the Secretary of the State.
1159 Sec. 15. Subsection (j) of section 9-437 of the general statutes is
1160 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
1161 2026):
1162 (j) (1) All ballots used at a primary shall be prepared by the clerk of
1163 the municipality in which such primary is held and shall be printed at
1164 the expense of the municipality. Not later than ten days prior to the
LCO No. 1561 37 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1165 commencement of the period of early voting at a primary, such clerk
1166 shall file with the Secretary of the State, for each voting district in such
1167 municipality at which such primary is held, the ballot to be used for
1168 such voting district. No such ballot shall be used at any primary unless
1169 it has been approved by the Secretary of the State.
1170 (2) Each municipality shall provide for all polling places:
1171 [(1)] (A) At least forty-eight hours before the primary, [such clerk
1172 shall have] sample ballots for general distribution by such clerk, which
1173 shall contain the offices or positions and names of candidates to be voted
1174 upon. Each such sample ballot shall also include printed instructions
1175 approved by the Secretary of the State concerning the use of the voting
1176 tabulator and information concerning the date of the primary and the
1177 hours during which polling places will be open. Such clerk shall have
1178 available for distribution such number of sample ballots as such clerk
1179 deems advisable, but in no event less than three which shall be posted
1180 inside the polling place so as to be visible to those within the polling
1181 place during the whole day of the primary. At least one of such sample
1182 ballots shall be posted so as to be visible to an elector being instructed
1183 on the demonstrator device, pursuant to section 9-260. If paper ballots
1184 are used in any primary, such sample paper ballots shall be overprinted
1185 with the word "Sample";
1186 [(2)] (B) Instructions on how to cast a provisional ballot, as prescribed
1187 by the Secretary of the State;
1188 [(3)] (C) Instructions for mail-in registrants and first-time voters who
1189 register to vote by mail on or after January 1, 2003, as prescribed by the
1190 Secretary of the State;
1191 [(4)] (D) General information concerning voting rights under federal
1192 and Connecticut laws, including information on the right of an
1193 individual to cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how to contact
1194 the appropriate officials if such rights are alleged to have been violated,
1195 as prescribed by the Secretary of the State; and
LCO No. 1561 38 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1196 [(5)] (E) General information on federal and state laws concerning
1197 prohibitions on acts of fraud and misrepresentation, as prescribed by
1198 the Secretary of the State.
1199 Sec. 16. Subsection (a) of section 9-135a of the general statutes is
1200 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
1201 passage):
1202 (a) Each absentee ballot shall be arranged to resemble the appropriate
1203 ballot and sample ballot as prescribed by law, and shall include, as
1204 applicable, the offices, party designations, names of candidates and
1205 questions to be voted upon and spaces for write-in votes. A replica of
1206 the state seal shall be printed on the ballot. The size, type, form,
1207 instructions, specifications for paper and printing and other
1208 specifications shall be prescribed by the Secretary of the State. Prior to
1209 printing such absentee ballots pursuant to this section, the clerk of the
1210 municipality shall file with the Secretary of the State, for each voting
1211 district in such municipality, the absentee ballot to be used for such
1212 voting district. No such absentee ballot shall be used at any election or
1213 primary unless it has been approved by the Secretary of the State.
1214 Sec. 17. Section 9-135b of the general statutes is repealed and the
1215 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
1216 (a) Immediately after the deadline for certification of all candidates
1217 whose names are to appear on the ballot, and in sufficient time to begin
1218 issuing absentee ballots on the day prescribed by law, the municipal
1219 clerk shall prepare the absentee ballots and have them printed. Prior to
1220 printing such ballots, the registrars of voters of the municipality may
1221 provide comments concerning the content and form of such ballots to
1222 the clerk, provided no such ballot shall be printed unless the Secretary
1223 of the State has approved of such ballot in accordance with section 9-
1224 135a, as amended by this act.
1225 (b) A layout model of each different absentee ballot shall be available
1226 for public inspection at the clerk's office prior to printing. The model
LCO No. 1561 39 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1227 shall indicate the type face to be used, the spelling and placement of
1228 names and other information to be printed on the ballots.
1229 (c) Immediately upon receiving the printed absentee ballots, the
1230 municipal clerk shall file one with the Secretary of the State or, if there
1231 are different ballots for different political subdivisions, one ballot for
1232 each subdivision. The clerk shall also file his affidavit with the Secretary,
1233 stating the number of ballots printed. The form of affidavit shall be
1234 prescribed by the Secretary. If any correction or alteration is
1235 subsequently made on any absentee ballot the clerk shall immediately
1236 file a corrected or altered ballot and, using the prescribed form, his
1237 affidavit stating the number of such ballots printed, with the Secretary.
1238 (d) If a vacancy in candidacy occurs after the ballots have been
1239 printed, the clerk may either reprint the ballots or cause printed stickers
1240 to be affixed to them so that the name of any candidate who has vacated
1241 his candidacy is deleted and the name of any candidate chosen to fill the
1242 vacancy as provided in section 9-428 or section 9-460 appears in the
1243 same position as that in which the vacated candidacy appeared except
1244 as provided in section 9-426 or 9-453s. If no candidate is chosen to fill
1245 such vacancy as so provided, the clerk shall cause the name of the
1246 candidate whose candidacy has been vacated to be obscured in such
1247 manner that such name is no longer visible.
1248 (e) [The] Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the
1249 Secretary of the State [shall examine each absentee ballot required to be
1250 filed pursuant to this section and if a ballot contains an omission or
1251 error, the Secretary shall order] from ordering the municipal clerk to
1252 reprint a corrected absentee ballot or to take such other action as the
1253 Secretary may deem appropriate in the case of an absentee ballot that
1254 contains an omission or error.
1255 Sec. 18. Section 9-256 of the general statutes is repealed and the
1256 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
1257 [The registrars of voters of each municipality shall, not less than ten
LCO No. 1561 40 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1258 days prior to the commencement of the period of early voting at an
1259 election, file with the Secretary of the State a sample ballot identical with
1260 those to be provided for each polling place under section 9-255. The
1261 Secretary of the State shall examine the sample ballot required to be filed
1262 under this section, and if such sample ballot contains an error, the
1263 Secretary of the State shall order] Notwithstanding the provisions of
1264 subsection (b) of section 9-250, as amended by this act, the Secretary of
1265 the State may order the registrars of voters to reprint a corrected
1266 [sample] ballot or to take other such action as the Secretary may deem
1267 appropriate in the case of any ballot that contains an omission or error.
1268 Sec. 19. Subsection (a) of section 9-140b of the general statutes is
1269 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
1270 passage):
1271 (a) An absentee ballot shall be cast at a primary, election or
1272 referendum only if: (1) It is mailed by (A) the ballot applicant, (B) a
1273 designee of a person who applies for an absentee ballot because of
1274 illness or physical disability, or (C) a member of the immediate family
1275 of an applicant who is a student, so that it is received by the clerk of the
1276 municipality in which the applicant is qualified to vote not later than the
1277 close of the polls; (2) it is returned by the applicant in person to the clerk
1278 by the day before [a regular election, special] the election or primary or
1279 prior to the opening of the polls on the day of [a] the referendum; (3) it
1280 is returned by a designee of an ill or physically disabled ballot applicant,
1281 in person, to said clerk not later than the close of the polls on the day of
1282 the election, primary or referendum; (4) it is returned by a member of
1283 the immediate family of the absentee voter, in person, to said clerk not
1284 later than the close of the polls on the day of the election, primary or
1285 referendum; (5) in the case of a presidential or overseas ballot, it is
1286 mailed or otherwise returned pursuant to the provisions of section 9-
1287 158g; or (6) it is returned with the proper identification as required by
1288 the Help America Vote Act, P.L. 107-252, as amended from time to time,
1289 if applicable, inserted in the outer envelope so such identification can be
1290 viewed without opening the inner envelope. A person returning an
LCO No. 1561 41 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1291 absentee ballot to the municipal clerk pursuant to subdivision (3) or (4)
1292 of this subsection shall present identification and, on the outer envelope
1293 of the absentee ballot, sign his name in the presence of the municipal
1294 clerk, and indicate his address, his relationship to the voter or his
1295 position, and the date and time of such return. As used in this section,
1296 "immediate family" means a dependent relative who resides in the
1297 individual's household or any spouse, child, parent or sibling of the
1298 individual.
1299 Sec. 20. Section 9-3 of the general statutes is repealed and the
1300 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
1301 (a) The Secretary of the State, by virtue of the office, shall be the
1302 Commissioner of Elections of the state, with such powers and duties
1303 relating to the conduct of elections as are prescribed by law and, unless
1304 otherwise provided by state statute, the Secretary's regulations,
1305 declaratory rulings, instructions and opinions, if in written form, and
1306 any order issued under subsection (b) of this section, shall be presumed
1307 as correctly interpreting and effectuating the administration of elections
1308 and primaries under this title, except for chapters 155 to 158, inclusive,
1309 and shall be executed, carried out or implemented, as the case may be,
1310 provided nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the right of
1311 appeal provided under the provisions of chapter 54. Any such written
1312 instruction or opinion shall be labeled as an instruction or opinion
1313 issued pursuant to this section, as applicable, and any such instruction
1314 or opinion shall cite any authority that is discussed in such instruction
1315 or opinion.
1316 (b) During any municipal, state or federal election, primary or
1317 recanvass, or any audit conducted pursuant to section 9-320f, the
1318 Secretary of the State may issue an order, whether orally or in writing,
1319 to any registrar of voters or moderator to correct any irregularity or
1320 impropriety in the conduct of such election, primary or recanvass or
1321 audit. Any such order shall be effective upon issuance. As soon as
1322 practicable after issuance of an oral order pursuant to this subsection,
LCO No. 1561 42 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1323 the Secretary shall reduce such order to writing, cite within such order
1324 any applicable provision of law authorizing such order and cause a copy
1325 of such written order to be delivered to the individual who is the subject
1326 of such order or, in the case that such order was originally issued in
1327 writing, issue a subsequent written order that conforms to such
1328 requirements. The Superior Court, on application of the Secretary or the
1329 Attorney General, may enforce by appropriate decree or process any
1330 such order issued pursuant to this subsection.
1331 (c) Whenever, during the ninety days preceding the day of an election
1332 or primary, one or more electors have alleged aggrievement under this
1333 title, the Secretary of the State may commence a declaratory judgment
1334 action under section 52-29 for a determination as to whether such elector
1335 or electors have been so aggrieved and for an order to ensure election
1336 administration procedures are properly executed and electors' rights are
1337 adequately protected under this title.
1338 Sec. 21. Subsection (d) of section 9-150a of the general statutes is
1339 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
1340 2026):
1341 (d) (1) If the statement on the inner envelope has not been signed as
1342 required by section 9-140a, such inner envelope shall not be opened or
1343 the ballot removed therefrom, and such inner envelope shall be replaced
1344 in the opened outer envelope which shall be marked "Rejected" and the
1345 reason therefor endorsed thereon by the counters. The moderator shall
1346 maintain a log of each absentee ballot applicant whose ballot was
1347 marked "Rejected" under this subdivision and include thereon for each
1348 such applicant the reason for the rejection. The moderator shall transmit
1349 such log to the Secretary of the State at the same time and in the same
1350 manner as the duplicate list to be transmitted to the Secretary by
1351 electronic means in accordance with section 9-314.
1352 (2) If such statement is signed but the individual completing the
1353 ballot is an individual described in subsection (a) of section 9-23r and
LCO No. 1561 43 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1354 has not met the requirements of subsection (e) of section 9-23r, the
1355 counters shall replace the ballot in the opened inner envelope, replace
1356 the inner envelope in the opened outer envelope and mark "Rejected as
1357 an Absentee Ballot" and endorse the reason for such rejection on the
1358 outer envelope, and the ballot shall be treated as a provisional ballot for
1359 federal offices only, pursuant to sections 9-232i to 9-232o, inclusive. The
1360 moderator shall maintain a log of each absentee ballot applicant whose
1361 ballot was marked "Rejected as an Absentee Ballot" under this
1362 subdivision and include thereon for each such applicant the reason for
1363 the rejection. The moderator shall transmit such log to the Secretary of
1364 the State at the same time and in the same manner as the duplicate list
1365 to be transmitted to the Secretary by electronic means in accordance
1366 with section 9-314.
1367 Sec. 22. Subsection (a) of section 9-311 of the 2026 supplement to the
1368 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
1369 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
1370 (a) If, within three days after an election, it appears to the moderator
1371 that there is a discrepancy in the returns of any voting district, such
1372 moderator shall forthwith within said period summon, by written
1373 notice delivered personally, the recanvass officials, consisting of at least
1374 two checkers of different political parties and at least two absentee ballot
1375 counters of different political parties who served at such election, and
1376 the registrars of voters of the municipality in which the election was
1377 held and such other officials as may be required to conduct such
1378 recanvass. Such written notice shall require the clerk or registrars of
1379 voters, as the case may be, to bring with them the depository envelopes
1380 required by section 9-150a, as amended by this act, the package of write-
1381 in ballots provided for in section 9-310, the absentee ballot applications,
1382 the list of absentee ballot applications, the registry list and the
1383 moderators' returns and shall require such recanvass officials to meet at
1384 a specified time not later than the fifth business day after such election
1385 to recanvass the returns of [a] each voting tabulator [or voting tabulators
1386 or] and all absentee ballots [or] and write-in ballots used in [such
LCO No. 1561 44 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1387 district] the municipality in such election. If any of such recanvass
1388 officials are unavailable at the time of the recanvass, the registrar of
1389 voters of the same political party as that of the recanvass official unable
1390 to attend shall designate another elector having previous training and
1391 experience in the conduct of elections to take such recanvass official's
1392 place. Before such recanvass is made, such moderator shall give notice,
1393 in writing, to the chairperson of the town committee of each political
1394 party which nominated candidates for the election, and, in the case of a
1395 state election, not later than twenty-four hours after a determination is
1396 made regarding the need for a recanvass to the Secretary of the State, of
1397 the time and place where such recanvass is to be made; and each such
1398 chairperson may send party representatives to be present at such
1399 recanvass. Such party representatives may observe, but no one other
1400 than a recanvass official may take part in the recanvass. If a party
1401 representative notes any irregularity in the recanvass procedure, such
1402 party representative shall be permitted to present evidence of such
1403 irregularity in any contest relating to the election.
1404 Sec. 23. Subsection (d) of section 9-311 of the 2026 supplement to the
1405 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
1406 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
1407 (d) (1) The moderator may, when any disorder arises that interferes
1408 with the conduct of a recanvass, including any attempt by a person other
1409 than a recanvass official to take part in such recanvass or by such a
1410 person to communicate with a recanvass official, [other than the
1411 moderator,] and the offender refuses to submit to the moderator's lawful
1412 authority, order that the offender be removed by the recanvass officials
1413 from such recanvass until the offender conforms to order or, if need be,
1414 until such recanvass is completed.
1415 (2) Each political party or, in the case of an office subject to recanvass
1416 for which there is more than one candidate from a political party, each
1417 candidate may appoint one representative to communicate directly with
1418 the moderator during a recanvass.
LCO No. 1561 45 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1419 Sec. 24. (NEW) (Effective from passage) Each ballot that has been cast at
1420 an election, primary or referendum, including any write-in ballot, shall
1421 be exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act.
1422 Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair the ability to
1423 conduct any recanvass or audit under chapter 147, 148, 152 or 153 of the
1424 general statutes. As used in this section, "ballot", "election",
1425 "referendum" and "write-in ballot" have the same meanings as provided
1426 in section 9-1 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, "primary"
1427 has the same meaning as provided in section 9-372 of the general
1428 statutes and "Freedom of Information Act" has the same meaning as
1429 provided in section 1-200 of the general statutes.
1430 Sec. 25. Subsection (n) of section 9-1 of the general statutes is repealed
1431 and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
1432 (n) "Referendum" means (1) a question or proposal which is
1433 submitted to a vote of the electors or voters of a municipality at any
1434 regular or special state or municipal election, as defined in this section,
1435 (2) a question or proposal which is submitted to a vote of the electors or
1436 voters, as the case may be, of a municipality at a meeting of such electors
1437 or voters, which meeting is not an election, as defined in subsection (d)
1438 of this section, and is not a town meeting, or (3) a question or proposal
1439 which is submitted to a vote of the electors or voters, as the case may be,
1440 of a municipality at a meeting of such electors or voters pursuant to
1441 section 7-7 or pursuant to charter, home rule ordinance or special act;
1442 Sec. 26. Section 9-50d of the general statutes is repealed and the
1443 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
1444 (a) (1) Whenever voter registration information maintained under
1445 this title by the Secretary of the State or any registrar of voters is
1446 provided pursuant to any provision of the general statutes, disclosure
1447 of a voter's date of birth shall be limited to only the [month and] year of
1448 birth, unless such voter registration information is requested and used
1449 for a state governmental purpose, as determined by the Secretary, in
LCO No. 1561 46 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1450 which case the voter's complete date of birth shall be provided. As used
1451 in this [section, a] subdivision, a state governmental purpose shall
1452 include, but not be limited to, jury administration.
1453 (2) (A) Voter registration information described in subdivision (1) of
1454 this subsection (i) may only be used for election-related, scholarly,
1455 journalistic, political or governmental purposes, and (ii) shall not be
1456 used for any personal, private or commercial purpose, including, but
1457 not limited to, (I) harassment of any voter or voter's household in a
1458 manner likely to cause terror, intimidation or alarm, (II) advertising,
1459 solicitation, sale or marketing of products or services to any voter or
1460 voter's household, and (III) reproduction in print, digital or broadcast
1461 visual or audio, or display in any other format, of such information.
1462 (B) Any person who violates the provisions of subparagraph (A) of
1463 this subdivision shall be fined a minimum of five hundred dollars for
1464 such violation and up to a maximum of two thousand dollars for each
1465 voter's registration information used in such violation.
1466 (3) The Secretary of the State may adopt regulations, in accordance
1467 with the provisions of chapter 54, concerning the use of voter
1468 registration information.
1469 (b) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, any motor
1470 vehicle operator's license number, identity card number or Social
1471 Security number on a voter registration record shall be confidential and
1472 shall not be disclosed to any person.
1473 (c) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, if a voter
1474 submits to the Secretary of the State a signed statement that
1475 nondisclosure of such voter's name from the official registry list is
1476 necessary for the safety of such voter or the voter's family, the name and
1477 address of such voter on his or her voter registration record shall be
1478 confidential and shall not be disclosed, except that an election, primary
1479 or referendum official may view such information on the official registry
1480 list when such list is used by any such official at a polling place on the
LCO No. 1561 47 of 49

Raised Bill No. 226
1481 day of an election, primary or referendum. Such signed statement shall
1482 be sworn under penalty of false statement, as provided in section 53a-
1483 157b.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 9-163aa
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 9-163bb
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 9-19j
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 9-228a
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 9-56
Sec. 6 July 1, 2026 9-229(d)
Sec. 7 July 1, 2026 9-169
Sec. 8 from passage 9-322a
Sec. 9 from passage New section
Sec. 10 from passage 9-388
Sec. 11 from passage 9-391(c)
Sec. 12 from passage 9-400
Sec. 13 from passage 9-452
Sec. 14 July 1, 2026 9-250
Sec. 15 July 1, 2026 9-437(j)
Sec. 16 from passage 9-135a(a)
Sec. 17 from passage 9-135b
Sec. 18 from passage 9-256
Sec. 19 from passage 9-140b(a)
Sec. 20 from passage 9-3
Sec. 21 July 1, 2026 9-150a(d)
Sec. 22 July 1, 2026 9-311(a)
Sec. 23 July 1, 2026 9-311(d)
Sec. 24 from passage New section
Sec. 25 from passage 9-1(n)
Sec. 26 from passage 9-50d